North Carolina, session 2025, HB610.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Public Instruction shall conduct a study to
determine the feasibility of requiring each local school administrative unit to maintain at least
one school that operates on a year-round school calendar for each grade level, kindergarten
through grade 12. All grade levels do not need to be offered year-round at the same school. At a
minimum, the Department shall study:
(1) Administrative costs associated with establishing and maintaining a school
that operates on a year-round calendar.
(2) Operational costs associated with establishing and maintaining a school that
operates on a year-round calendar.
(3) Transportation and other logistical challenges to having students from across
a local school administrative unit attend the year-round school if they choose.
(4) Barriers to establishing a year-round school.
(5) Anticipated enrollment if year-round schools were more accessible.
SECTION 2. The Department of Public Instruction is authorized to work with a
third-party organization to complete this study.
SECTION 3. The Department of Public Instruction shall report the results of the
study, along with any legislative or budgetary recommendations, to the Joint Legislative
Education Oversight Committee no later than January 15, 2027.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H610-v-1*